Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-3102
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Municipal Custodianship for Dissolved Homeowners Associations Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Common area means lot or outlot within a plat or subdivision of real property including the improvements thereon owned or otherwise maintained, cared for, or administered by the homeowners association for the common use, benefit, and enjoyment of its members;

(2) Homeowners association means a nonprofit corporation duly incorporated under the laws of the State of Nebraska for the purpose of enforcing the restrictive covenants established upon the real property legally described in the articles of incorporation which is located within the corporate limits of a municipality, each member of which is an owner of a lot located within the plat or subdivision and, by virtue of membership or ownership of a lot, is obligated to pay costs for the administration, maintenance, and care of the common area within the plat or subdivision. Homeowners association includes associations of residential homeowners, nonresidential property owners, or both;

(3) Lot means any designated parcel of land located within a plat or subdivision to be separately owned, used, developed, or built upon;

(4) Member means an owner that is qualified to be a member of a homeowners association by virtue of ownership of a lot covered by the property described in the declaration and articles of incorporation of a homeowners association dissolved under section 21-19,138;

(5) Municipality means any city or incorporated village of this state;

(6) Owner means the owner of a lot within the plat or subdivision, but does not include a person who has an interest in a lot solely as security for an obligation; and

(7) Real property means the real property described in the articles of incorporation which is located within or to be located within a plat or subdivision approved by a municipality and which is subject to restrictive covenants to be enforced by the homeowners association and filed of record in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the real property is located.

Laws 2015, LB304, § 2.